Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.020

Issuance of process.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law governing service of process in civil cases, a court of limited jurisdiction having jurisdiction over an alleged civil infraction may issue process anywhere within the state.

[ 1987 c 456 s 10.]